Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.395 RCW to read as follows:(1) In any case in which the department attempts to inspect a private detention facility and is prevented by the private detention facility from entry to conduct an inspection, the private detention facility violates this chapter, and the department, in accordance with the authority under RCW 43.70.095, may assess a civil fine of up to $1,000 per day for the first 30 days from the department's initial attempt to inspect. If the private detention facility continues to prevent access to the department for inspection after 30 days have elapsed from the department's initial attempt to inspect, the department may fine the private detention facility up to $10,000 per day for the next 30 days during which the private detention facility continues to prevent access. If the private detention facility continues to prevent access to the department for inspection after 60 days from the department's initial attempt to inspect, the department may fine the private detention facility up to $15,000 per day until access is granted to the department to allow for inspection as permitted in this chapter. Moneys collected under this section must be deposited into the enforcement accountability and community repair account.(2) For the purposes of this section, "department" means the Washington state department of health.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70.395 RCW to read as follows:(1) The enforcement accountability and community repair account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from civil fines charged by the department of health for lack of entry into private detention facilities for the purposes of announced and unannounced inspections under section 1 of this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be used for providing assistance to individuals or families with members that have been wrongfully detained and released by the court, assaulted, or killed at a private detention facility, or during the process of being taken to a private detention facility, which may include:(a) Housing assistance;(b) Food assistance;(c) Legal services;(d) Wage replacement;(e) Child care assistance;(f) Transportation assistance;(g) Grants to nonprofit organizations providing services included in this section to immigrant communities; and(h) Financial compensation.(2) Services provided to individuals through this account are not an admission of fault by the state. This section does not create an entitlement to compensation or assistance for any individual.--- END ---